Nevada, session 83, SB369.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 657 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Covered account” means an account which a
financial institution has actual knowledge is:
1. An account of an older person or vulnerable person; or
2. An account to which an older person or vulnerable person
is a beneficiary.
Sec. 3. “Covered transaction” means a requested
disbursement from or a requested transaction involving a covered
account that exceeds $5,000.
Sec. 4. “Emergency financial contact” means a person who
is designated as an emergency financial contact pursuant to
section 5 of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
financial institution shall, before opening a covered account,
require the prospective account holder to designate an emergency
financial contact by completing a form that contains:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the account holder and any joint account holder; and
(b) The name and telephone number of a person to serve as
the emergency financial contact of the account holder.
2. A person designated an emergency financial contact
pursuant to subsection 1 must be over 18 years of age.
3. A financial institution may open a covered account without
complying with the provisions of subsection 1 if the prospective
account holder declines to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form acknowledging the declination.
-
*SB369*

– 4 –
Sec. 6. The account holder of a covered account that was
opened in a financial institution before October 1, 2025, may,
upon request of the account holder, designate an emergency
financial contact in the manner set forth in subsection 1 of section
5 of this act. A financial institution may notify and provide
information to account holders of covered accounts that were
opened before October 1, 2025, concerning the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 7. 1. If an account holder of a covered account has
designated an emergency financial contact pursuant to section 5
or 6 of this act, the financial institution:
(a) Shall attempt to contact the emergency financial contact
within 24 hours after a covered transaction is requested involving
the covered account of the account holder to request an opinion
from the emergency financial contact concerning whether the
covered transaction is the result of exploitation; and
(b) Shall not proceed with the covered transaction until the
later of 24 hours after the attempt to contact the emergency
financial contact or, if applicable, the expiration of any temporary
delay imposed pursuant to NRS 657.290.
2. If, after attempting to contact the emergency financial
contact pursuant to subsection 1, an officer or employee of the
financial institution knows or suspects that exploitation of an
account holder has occurred or is occurring, the officer or
employee shall report the known or suspected exploitation to the
designated reporter in accordance with NRS 657.290, who shall
proceed in accordance with the provisions of that section.
Sec. 8. 1. If a financial institution violates the provisions of
section 7 of this act and that violation results in the exploitation of
the account holder, the account holder may bring an action
against the financial institution. In such an action, the account
holder is entitled to treble damages.
2. In any action brought pursuant to subsection 1, the
plaintiff must allege in the complaint, and prove at the trial, that,
as of the time of the violation, the plaintiff had designated an
emergency financial contact in the manner set forth in subsection
1 of section 5 of this act.
Sec. 9. NRS 657.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
657.220 As used in NRS 657.220 to 657.290, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 657.230 to 657.270,
inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB369*

– 5 –
Sec. 10. NRS 657.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
657.290 1. Each financial institution shall designate a person
or persons to whom an officer or employee of the financial
institution must report known or suspected exploitation of an older
person or vulnerable person.
2. If an officer or employee reports known or suspected
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person to a designated
reporter and, based on such a report or based on his or her own
observations or knowledge, the designated reporter knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, the designated reporter:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall report the
known or suspected exploitation of the older person or vulnerable
person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office;
(3) The county’s office for protective services, if one exists
in the county where the suspected action occurred; or
(4) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services;
(b) Shall make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable;
and
(c) May temporarily delay a requested disbursement from, or a
requested transaction involving, an account of an older person or
vulnerable person or an account to which an older person or
vulnerable person is a beneficiary , except that if the disbursement
or transaction is a covered transaction, the designated reporter
shall temporarily delay the transaction. A designated reporter [:]
who temporarily delays a disbursement or transaction pursuant to
this paragraph shall:
(1) Not later than 2 business days after the date on which the
requested disbursement or transaction is delayed:
(I) [Provides] Provide written notification of the delay
and the reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact
business on the account [,] and an emergency financial contact, if
applicable, except a party or emergency financial contact who is
reasonably believed to have engaged in the suspected exploitation;
and
(II) [Notifies] Notify the local office of the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services and a local law enforcement agency of the delay;
and
-
*SB369*

– 6 –
(2) [Notifies] Notify the local office of the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services and the appropriate local law enforcement agency
of any new information that is relevant to the delay within a
reasonable time after becoming aware of the information.
3. If the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person
involves an act or omission of the Aging and Disability Services
Division, another division of the Department of Health and Human
Services or a law enforcement agency, the designated reporter shall
make the report to an agency other than the one alleged to have
committed the act or omission.
4. In accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
239A.070, in making a report pursuant to this section, a designated
reporter may:
(a) Disclose any facts or information that form the basis of the
determination that the designated reporter knows or has reasonable
cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable person has been
exploited, including, without limitation, the identity of any person
believed to be involved in the exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person; and
(b) Provide any financial records or other documentation
relating to the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
5. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 8 of this act, a
financial institution and any of its officers, employees and
designated reporters are immune from civil, criminal and
administrative liability arising from:
(a) Making a report in good faith pursuant to this section [;] or
section 7 of this act;
(b) Delaying a requested disbursement or transaction involving
the known or suspected exploitation of an older person or vulnerable
person pursuant to this section; [or]
(c) Taking any action required by section 7 of this act; or
(d) Taking any reasonable action which is:
(1) Performed in furtherance of a duty or authorization
created by subsection 2, 3 or 4 [;] or section 7 of this act; and
(2) Based upon a reasonable belief that an older person or
vulnerable person has been exploited.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 7 and 8, a delay in a requested disbursement or
transaction authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2
expires 15 business days after the date on which the requested
disbursement or transaction was delayed. If the local office of the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services or a local law enforcement agency requests in
-
*SB369*

– 7 –
writing that the designated reporter extend the delay, the delay
expires upon the earlier of:
(a) Twenty-five business days after the date on which the
requested disbursement or transaction was delayed; or
(b) Upon the written request of the local office of the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services or the local law enforcement agency that requested
the extension of the delay or upon the order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
7. A delay in a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 may expire
before the period set forth in subsection 6 and the designated
reporter may proceed with the requested disbursement or transaction
if the designated reporter reasonably believes that the requested
disbursement or transaction will not result in exploitation of the
older person or vulnerable person.
8. A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order
extending a delay of a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 based on the
petition of the local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services, a local
law enforcement agency or any other interested party.
9. When determining whether an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, a designated reporter may consider any
information received pursuant to section 7 of this act and any of
the following circumstances, if applicable and without limitation:
(a) A requested disbursement from, or a requested transaction
involving, an account of an older person or vulnerable person or an
account to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary that the older person or vulnerable person cannot
explain;
(b) A request to close a certificate of deposit of an older person
or vulnerable person that is made:
(1) Before the date of maturity of the certificate of deposit;
and
(2) With apparent disregard for any penalty associated with
closing the certificate of deposit before the date of maturity of the
certificate of deposit;
(c) A check written by an older person or vulnerable person
under suspicious circumstances;
(d) An uncharacteristic attempt by an older person or vulnerable
person to initiate a wire transfer of a significant sum of money;
(e) A suspicious signature on documentation relating to an
account of an older person or vulnerable person;
(f) A suspicious alteration to a:
-
*SB369*

– 8 –
(1) Trust to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary; or
(2) Will or trust for which an older person or vulnerable
person is a testator or trustee;
(g) A suspicious alteration in a power of attorney relating to an
older person or vulnerable person; and
(h) A person attempting to initiate a financial transaction on
behalf of an older person or vulnerable person without proper
documentation.
Sec. 11. Chapter 672 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 12 to 18, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 12. “Covered account” means an account which a credit
union has actual knowledge is:
1. An account of an older person or vulnerable person; or
2. An account to which an older person or vulnerable person
is a beneficiary.
Sec. 13. “Covered transaction” means a requested
disbursement from or a requested transaction involving a covered
account that exceeds $5,000.
Sec. 14. “Emergency financial contact” means a person who
is designated as an emergency financial contact pursuant to
section 15 of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
credit union shall, before opening a covered account, require the
prospective account holder to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form that contains:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the account holder and any joint account holder; and
(b) The name and telephone number of a person to serve as
the emergency financial contact of the account holder.
2. A person designated an emergency financial contact
pursuant to subsection 1 must be over 18 years of age.
3. A credit union may open a covered account without
complying with the provisions of subsection 1 if the prospective
account holder declines to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form acknowledging the declination.
Sec. 16. The account holder of a covered account that was
opened in a credit union before October 1, 2025, may, upon
request of the account holder, designate an emergency financial
contact in the manner set forth in subsection 1 of section 15 of this
act. A credit union may notify and provide information to account
holders of covered accounts that were opened before October 1,
2025, concerning the provisions of this section.
-
*SB369*

– 9 –
Sec. 17. 1. If an account holder of a covered account has
designated an emergency financial contact pursuant to section 15
or 16 of this act, the credit union:
(a) Shall attempt to contact the emergency financial contact
within 24 hours after a covered transaction is requested involving
the covered account of the account holder to request an opinion
from the emergency financial contact concerning whether the
covered transaction is the result of exploitation; and
(b) Shall not proceed with the covered transaction until the
later of 24 hours after the attempt to contact the emergency
financial contact or, if applicable, the expiration of any temporary
delay imposed pursuant to NRS 672.779.
2. If, after attempting to contact the emergency financial
contact pursuant to subsection 1, an employee of the credit union
knows or suspects that exploitation of an account holder has
occurred or is occurring, the officer or employee shall report the
known or suspected exploitation to the designated reporter in
accordance with NRS 672.779, who shall proceed in accordance
with the provisions of that section.
Sec. 18. 1. If a credit union violates the provisions of
section 17 of this act and that violation results in the exploitation
of the account holder, the account holder may bring an action
against the credit union. In such an action, the account holder is
entitled to treble damages.
2. In any action brought pursuant to subsection 1, the
plaintiff must allege in the complaint, and prove at the trial, that,
as of the time of the violation, the plaintiff had designated an
emergency financial contact in the manner set forth in subsection
1 of section 15 of this act.
Sec. 19. NRS 672.767 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.767 As used in NRS 672.767 to 672.779, inclusive, and
sections 12 to 18, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 672.769 to 672.777,
inclusive, and sections 12, 13 and 14 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 20. NRS 672.779 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.779 1. Each credit union shall designate a person or
persons to whom an employee of the credit union must report
known or suspected exploitation of an older person or vulnerable
person.
2. If an employee reports known or suspected exploitation of
an older person or vulnerable person to a designated reporter and,
based on such a report or based on his or her own observations or
knowledge, the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause
-
*SB369*

– 10 –
to believe that an older person or vulnerable person has been
exploited, the designated reporter : [shall:]
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall report
the known or suspected exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office;
(3) The county’s office for protective services, if one exists
in the county where the suspected action occurred; or
(4) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; [and]
(b) [Make] Shall make such a report as soon as reasonably
practicable [.] ; and
(c) May temporarily delay a requested disbursement from, or a
requested transaction involving, an account of an older person or
vulnerable person or an account to which an older person or
vulnerable person is a beneficiary, except that if the disbursement
or transaction is a covered transaction the designated reporter
shall temporarily delay the transaction. A designated reporter who
temporarily delays a disbursement or transaction pursuant to this
paragraph shall:
(1) Not later than 2 business days after the date on which
the requested disbursement or transaction is delayed:
(I) Provide written notification of the delay and the
reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business
on the account and an emergency financial contact, if applicable,
except a party or emergency financial contact who is reasonably
believed to have engaged in the suspected exploitation; and
(II) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and a local law enforcement agency of the delay; and
(2) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and the appropriate law enforcement agency of any new
information that is relevant to the delay within a reasonable time
after becoming aware of the information.
3. If the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person
involves an act or omission of the Aging and Disability Services
Division, another division of the Department of Health and Human
Services or a law enforcement agency, the designated reporter shall
make the report to an agency other than the one alleged to have
committed the act or omission.
-
*SB369*

– 11 –
4. In accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
239A.070, in making a report pursuant to this section, a designated
reporter may:
(a) Disclose any facts or information that form the basis of the
determination that the designated reporter knows or has reasonable
cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable person has been
exploited, including, without limitation, the identity of any person
believed to be involved in the exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person; and
(b) Provide any financial records or other documentation
relating to the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
5. [An employee] Except as otherwise provided in section 18
of this act, a credit union and any of its employees and [the]
designated [reporter] reporters are [entitled to the immunity]
immune from civil, criminal and administrative liability [set forth
in NRS 200.5096 for making a report in good faith.] arising from:
(a) Making a report in good faith pursuant to this section or
section 17 of this act;
(b) Delaying a requested disbursement or transaction
involving the known or suspected exploitation of an older person
or vulnerable person pursuant to this section;
(c) Taking any action required by section 17 of this act; or
(d) Taking any reasonable action which is:
(1) Performed in furtherance of a duty or authorization
created by subsection 2, 3 or 4 or section 17 of this act; and
(2) Based upon a reasonable belief that an older person or
vulnerable person has been exploited.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 7 and 8, a delay in a requested disbursement or
transaction authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection
2 expires 15 business days after the date on which the requested
disbursement or transaction was delayed. If the local office of the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of
Health and Human Services or a local law enforcement agency
requests in writing that the designated reporter extend the delay,
the delay expires upon the earlier of:
(a) Twenty-five business days after the date on which the
requested disbursement or transaction was delayed; or
(b) Upon the written request of the local office of the Aging
and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services or the local law enforcement agency that
requested the extension of the delay or upon the order of a court
of competent jurisdiction.
7. A delay in a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 may
-
*SB369*

– 12 –
expire before the period set forth in subsection 6 and the
designated reporter may proceed with the requested disbursement
or transaction if the designated reporter reasonably believes that
the requested disbursement or transaction will not result in
exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
8. A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order
extending a delay of a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 based on
the petition of the local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services, a local
law enforcement agency or any other interested party.
9. When determining whether an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, a designated reporter may consider any
information received pursuant to section 17 of this act and any of
the following circumstances, if applicable and without limitation:
(a) A requested disbursement from, or a requested transaction
involving, an account of an older person or vulnerable person or
an account to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary that the older person or vulnerable person cannot
explain;
(b) A request to close a certificate of deposit of an older person
or vulnerable person that is made:
(1) Before the date of maturity of the certificate of deposit;
and
(2) With apparent disregard for any penalty associated with
closing the certificate of deposit before the date of maturity of the
certificate of deposit;
(c) A check written by an older person or vulnerable person
under suspicious circumstances;
(d) An uncharacteristic attempt by an older person or
vulnerable person to initiate a wire transfer of a significant sum of
money;
(e) A suspicious signature on documentation relating to an
account of an older person or vulnerable person;
(f) A suspicious alteration to a:
(1) Trust to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary; or
(2) Will or trust for which an older person or vulnerable
person is a testator or trustee;
(g) A suspicious alteration in a power of attorney relating to
an older person or a vulnerable person; and
(h) A person attempting to initiate a financial transaction on
behalf of an older person or vulnerable person without proper
documentation.
-
*SB369*

– 13 –
Sec. 21. Chapter 673 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 22 to 28, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 22. “Covered account” means an account which a
savings bank has actual knowledge is:
1. An account of an older person or vulnerable person; or
2. An account to which an older person or vulnerable person
is a beneficiary.
Sec. 23. “Covered transaction” means a requested
disbursement from or a requested transaction involving a covered
account that exceeds $5,000.
Sec. 24. “Emergency financial contact” means a person who
is designated as an emergency financial contact pursuant to
section 25 of this act.
Sec. 25. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
savings bank shall, before opening a covered account, require the
prospective account holder to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form that contains:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the account holder and any joint account holder; and
(b) The name and telephone number of a person to serve as
the emergency financial contact of the account holder.
2. A person designated an emergency financial contact
pursuant to subsection 1 must be over 18 years of age.
3. A savings bank may open a covered account without
complying with the provisions of subsection 1 if the prospective
account holder declines to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form acknowledging the declination.
Sec. 26. The account holder of a covered account that was
opened in a savings bank before October 1, 2025, may, upon
request of the account holder, designate an emergency financial
contact in the manner set forth in subsection 1 of section 25 of this
act. A savings bank may notify and provide information to account
holders of covered accounts that were opened before October 1,
2025, concerning the provisions of this section.
Sec. 27. 1. If an account holder of a covered account has
designated an emergency financial contact pursuant to section 25
or 26 of this act, the savings bank:
(a) Shall attempt to contact the emergency financial contact
within 24 hours after a covered transaction is requested involving
the covered account of the account holder to request an opinion
from the emergency financial contact concerning whether the
covered transaction is the result of exploitation; and
(b) Shall not proceed with the covered transaction until the
later of 24 hours after the attempt to contact the emergency
-
*SB369*

– 14 –
financial contact or, if applicable, the expiration of any temporary
delay imposed pursuant to NRS 673.807.
2. If, after attempting to contact the emergency financial
contact pursuant to subsection 1, a director, officer or employee of
the savings bank knows or suspects that exploitation of an account
holder has occurred or is occurring, the officer or employee shall
report the known or suspected exploitation to the designated
reporter in accordance with NRS 673.807, who shall proceed in
accordance with the provisions of that section.
Sec. 28. 1. If a savings bank violates the provisions of
section 27 of this act and that violation results in the exploitation
of the account holder, the account holder may bring an action
against the savings bank. In such an action, the account holder is
entitled to treble damages.
2. In any action brought pursuant to subsection 1, the
plaintiff must allege in the complaint, and prove at the trial, that,
as of the time of the violation, the plaintiff had designated an
emergency financial contact in the manner set forth in subsection
1 of section 25 of this act.
Sec. 29. NRS 673.773 is hereby amended to read as follows:
673.773 As used in NRS 673.773 to 673.807, inclusive, and
sections 22 to 28, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 673.777 to 673.797,
inclusive, and sections 22, 23 and 24 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 30. NRS 673.807 is hereby amended to read as follows:
673.807 1. Each savings bank shall designate a person or
persons to whom a director, officer or employee of the savings bank
must report known or suspected exploitation of an older person or
vulnerable person.
2. If a director, officer or employee reports known or suspected
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person to a designated
reporter and, based on such a report or based on his or her own
observations or knowledge, the designated reporter knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, the designated reporter [shall:] :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall report
the known or suspected exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office;
(3) The county’s office for protective services, if one exists
in the county where the suspected action occurred; or
-
*SB369*

– 15 –
(4) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; [and]
(b) [Make] Shall make such a report as soon as reasonably
practicable [.] ; and
(c) May temporarily delay a requested disbursement from, or a
requested transaction involving, an account of an older person or
vulnerable person or an account to which an older person or
vulnerable person is a beneficiary, except that if the disbursement
or transaction is a covered transaction, the designated reporter
shall temporarily delay the transaction. A designated reporter who
temporarily delays a disbursement or transaction pursuant to this
paragraph shall:
(1) Not later than 2 business days after the date on which
the requested disbursement or transaction is delayed:
(I) Provide written notification of the delay and the
reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business
on the account and an emergency financial contact, if applicable,
except a party or emergency financial contact who is reasonably
believed to have engaged in the suspected exploitation; and
(II) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and a local law enforcement agency of the delay; and
(2) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and the appropriate law enforcement agency of any new
information that is relevant to the delay within a reasonable time
after becoming aware of the information.
3. If the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person
involves an act or omission of the Aging and Disability Services
Division, another division of the Department of Health and Human
Services or a law enforcement agency, the designated reporter shall
make the report to an agency other than the one alleged to have
committed the act or omission.
4. In accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
239A.070, in making a report pursuant to this section, a designated
reporter may:
(a) Disclose any facts or information that form the basis of the
determination that the designated reporter knows or has reasonable
cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable person has been
exploited, including, without limitation, the identity of any person
believed to be involved in the exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person; and
-
*SB369*

– 16 –
(b) Provide any financial records or other documentation
relating to the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
5. [A director, officer, employee] Except as otherwise
provided in section 28 of this act, a savings bank and any of its
directors, officers, employees and [the] designated [reporter]
reporters are [entitled to the immunity] immune from civil,
criminal and administrative liability [set forth in NRS 200.5096 for
making a report in good faith.] arising from:
(a) Making a report in good faith pursuant to this section or
section 27 of this act;
(b) Delaying a requested disbursement or transaction
involving the known or suspected exploitation of an older person
or vulnerable person pursuant to this section.
(c) Taking any action required by section 27 of this act; or
(d) Taking any reasonable action which is:
(1) Performed in furtherance of a duty or authorization
created by subsection 2, 3 or 4 or section 27 of this act; and
(2) Based upon a reasonable belief that an older person or
vulnerable person has been exploited.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 7 and 8, a delay in a requested disbursement or
transaction authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection
2 expires 15 business days after the date on which the requested
disbursement or transaction was delayed. If the local office of the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of
Health and Human Services or a local law enforcement agency
requests in writing that the designated reporter extend the delay,
the delay expires upon the earlier of:
(a) Twenty-five business days after the date on which the
requested disbursement or transaction was delayed; or
(b) Upon the written request of the local office of the Aging
and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services or the local law enforcement agency that
requested the extension of the delay or upon the order of a court
of competent jurisdiction.
7. A delay in a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 may
expire before the period set forth in subsection 6 and the
designated reporter may proceed with the requested disbursement
or transaction if the designated reporter reasonably believes that
the requested disbursement or transaction will not result in
exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
8. A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order
extending a delay of a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 based on
-
*SB369*

– 17 –
the petition of the local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services, a local
law enforcement agency or any other interested party.
9. When determining whether an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, a designated reporter may consider any
information received pursuant to section 27 of this act and any of
the following circumstances, if applicable and without limitation:
(a) A requested disbursement from, or a requested transaction
involving, an account of an older person or vulnerable person or
an account to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary that the older person or vulnerable person cannot
explain;
(b) A request to close a certificate of deposit of an older person
or vulnerable person that is made:
(1) Before the date of maturity of the certificate of deposit;
and
(2) With apparent disregard for any penalty associated with
closing the certificate of deposit before the date of maturity of the
certificate of deposit;
(c) A check written by an older person or vulnerable person
under suspicious circumstances;
(d) An uncharacteristic attempt by an older person or
vulnerable person to initiate a wire transfer of a significant sum of
money;
(e) A suspicious signature on documentation relating to an
account of an older person or vulnerable person;
(f) A suspicious alteration to a:
(1) Trust to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary; or
(2) Will or trust for which an older person or vulnerable
person is a testator or trustee;
(g) A suspicious alteration in a power of attorney relating to
an older person or a vulnerable person; and
(h) A person attempting to initiate a financial transaction on
behalf of an older person or vulnerable person without proper
documentation.
Sec. 31. Chapter 677 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 32 to 38, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 32. “Covered account” means an account which a
licensee has actual knowledge is:
1. An account of an older person or vulnerable person; or
2. An account to which an older person or vulnerable person
is a beneficiary.
-
*SB369*

– 18 –
Sec. 33. “Covered transaction” means a requested
disbursement from or a requested transaction involving a covered
account that exceeds $5,000.
Sec. 34. “Emergency financial contact” means a person who
is designated as an emergency financial contact pursuant to
section 35 of this act.
Sec. 35. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
licensee shall, before opening a covered account, require the
prospective account holder to designate an emergency financial
contact by completing a form that contains:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the account holder and any joint account holder; and
(b) The name and telephone number of a person to serve as
the emergency financial contact of the account holder.
2. A person designated an emergency financial contact
pursuant to subsection 1 must be over 18 years of age.
3. A licensee may open a covered account without complying
with the provisions of subsection 1 if the prospective account
holder declines to designate an emergency financial contact by
completing a form acknowledging the declination.
Sec. 36. The account holder of a covered account that was
opened in a licensee before October 1, 2025, may, upon request of
the account holder, designate an emergency financial contact in
the manner set forth in subsection 1 of section 35 of this act. A
licensee may notify and provide information to account holders of
covered accounts that were opened before October 1, 2025,
concerning the provisions of this section.
Sec. 37. 1. If an account holder of a covered account has
designated an emergency financial contact pursuant to section 35
or 36 of this act, the licensee:
(a) Shall attempt to contact the emergency financial contact
within 24 hours after a covered transaction is requested involving
the covered account of the account holder to request an opinion
from the emergency financial contact concerning whether the
covered transaction is the result of exploitation; and
(b) Shall not proceed with the covered transaction until the
later of 24 hours after the attempt to contact the emergency
financial contact or, if applicable, the expiration of any temporary
delay imposed pursuant to NRS 677.707.
2. If, after attempting to contact the emergency financial
contact pursuant to subsection 1, an officer or employee of the
licensee knows or suspects that exploitation of an account holder
has occurred or is occurring, the officer or employee shall report
the known or suspected exploitation to the designated reporter in
-
*SB369*

– 19 –
accordance with NRS 677.707, who shall proceed in accordance
with the provisions of that section.
Sec. 38. 1. If a licensee violates the provisions of section 37
of this act and that violation results in the exploitation of the
account holder, the account holder may bring an action against
the licensee. In such an action, the account holder is entitled to
treble damages.
2. In any action brought pursuant to subsection 1, the
plaintiff must allege in the complaint, and prove at the trial, that,
as of the time of the violation, the plaintiff had designated an
emergency financial contact in the manner set forth in subsection
1 of section 35 of this act.
Sec. 39. NRS 677.673 is hereby amended to read as follows:
677.673 As used in NRS 677.673 to 677.707, inclusive, and
sections 32 to 38, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 677.677 to 677.697,
inclusive, and sections 32, 33 and 34 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 40. NRS 677.707 is hereby amended to read as follows:
677.707 1. Each licensee shall designate a person or persons
to whom an officer or employee of the licensee must report known
or suspected exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person.
2. If an officer or employee reports known or suspected
exploitation of an older person or vulnerable person to a designated
reporter and, based on such a report or based on his or her own
observations or knowledge, the designated reporter knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, the designated reporter : [shall:]
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall report
the known or suspected exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office;
(3) The county’s office for protective services, if one exists
in the county where the suspected action occurred; or
(4) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; [and]
(b) [Make] Shall make such a report as soon as reasonably
practicable [.] ; and
(c) May temporarily delay a requested disbursement from, or a
requested transaction involving, an account of an older person or
vulnerable person or an account to which an older person or
vulnerable person is a beneficiary, except that if the disbursement
-
*SB369*

– 20 –
or transaction is a covered transaction, the designated reporter
shall temporarily delay the transaction. A designated reporter who
temporarily delays a disbursement or transaction pursuant to this
paragraph shall:
(1) Not later than 2 business days after the date on which
the requested disbursement or transaction is delayed:
(I) Provide written notification of the delay and the
reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business
on the account and an emergency financial contact, if applicable,
except a party or emergency financial contact who is reasonably
believed to have engaged in the suspected exploitation; and
(II) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and a local law enforcement agency of the delay; and
(2) Notify the local office of the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Health and Human
Services and the appropriate law enforcement agency of any new
information that is relevant to the delay within a reasonable time
after becoming aware of the information.
3. If the designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person
involves an act or omission of the Aging and Disability Services
Division, another division of the Department of Health and Human
Services or a law enforcement agency, the designated reporter shall
make the report to an agency other than the one alleged to have
committed the act or omission.
4. In accordance with the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
239A.070, in making a report pursuant to this section, a designated
reporter may:
(a) Disclose any facts or information that form the basis of the
determination that the designated reporter knows or has reasonable
cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable person has been
exploited, including, without limitation, the identity of any person
believed to be involved in the exploitation of the older person or
vulnerable person; and
(b) Provide any financial records or other documentation
relating to the exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
5. [An officer, employee] Except as otherwise provided in
section 38 of this act, a licensee and any of its officers, employees
and [the] designated [reporter] reporters are [entitled to the
immunity] immune from civil, criminal and administrative liability
[set forth in NRS 200.5096 for making a report in good faith.]
arising from:
(a) Making a report in good faith pursuant to this section or
section 37 of this act;
-
*SB369*

– 21 –
(b) Delaying a requested disbursement or transaction
involving the known or suspected exploitation of an older person
or vulnerable person pursuant to this section;
(c) Taking any action required by section 37 of this act; or
(d) Taking any reasonable action which is:
(1) Performed in furtherance of a duty or authorization
created by subsection 2, 3 or 4 or section 37 of this act; and
(2) Based upon a reasonable belief that an older person or
vulnerable person has been exploited.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 7 and 8, a delay in a requested disbursement or
transaction authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection
2 expires 15 business days after the date on which the requested
disbursement or transaction was delayed. If the local office of the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of
Health and Human Services or a local law enforcement agency
requests in writing that the designated reporter extend the delay,
the delay expires upon the earlier of:
(a) Twenty-five business days after the date on which the
requested disbursement or transaction was delayed; or
(b) Upon the written request of the local office of the Aging
and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services or the local law enforcement agency that
requested the extension of the delay or upon the order of a court
of competent jurisdiction.
7. A delay in a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 may
expire before the period set forth in subsection 6 and the
designated reporter may proceed with the requested disbursement
or transaction if the designated reporter reasonably believes that
the requested disbursement or transaction will not result in
exploitation of the older person or vulnerable person.
8. A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order
extending a delay of a requested disbursement or transaction
authorized or required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2 based on
the petition of the local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services, a local
law enforcement agency or any other interested party.
9. When determining whether an older person or vulnerable
person has been exploited, a designated reporter may consider any
information received pursuant to section 37 of this act and any of
the following circumstances, if applicable and without limitation:
(a) A requested disbursement from, or a requested transaction
involving, an account of an older person or vulnerable person or
an account to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
-
*SB369*

– 22 –
beneficiary that the older person or vulnerable person cannot
explain;
(b) A request to close a certificate of deposit of an older person
or vulnerable person that is made:
(1) Before the date of maturity of the certificate of deposit;
and
(2) With apparent disregard for any penalty associated with
closing the certificate of deposit before the date of maturity of the
certificate of deposit;
(c) A check written by an older person or vulnerable person
under suspicious circumstances;
(d) An uncharacteristic attempt by an older person or
vulnerable person to initiate a wire transfer of a significant sum of
money;
(e) A suspicious signature on documentation relating to an
account of an older person or vulnerable person;
(f) A suspicious alteration to a:
(1) Trust to which an older person or vulnerable person is a
beneficiary; or
(2) Will or trust for which an older person or vulnerable
person is a testator or trustee;
(g) A suspicious alteration in a power of attorney relating to
an older person or a vulnerable person; and
(h) A person attempting to initiate a financial transaction on
behalf of an older person or vulnerable person without proper
documentation.
Sec. 41. NRS 162A.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
162A.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) A person shall either accept an acknowledged power of
attorney, or request a certification, a translation or an opinion of
counsel pursuant to NRS 162A.360, not later than 10 business days
after presentation of the power of attorney for acceptance;
(b) If a person requests a certification, a translation or an
opinion of counsel pursuant to NRS 162A.360, the person shall
accept the power of attorney not later than 5 business days after
receipt of the certification, translation or opinion of counsel; and
(c) A person may not require an additional or different form of
power of attorney for authority granted in the power of attorney
presented.
2. A person is not required to accept an acknowledged power
of attorney if:
(a) The person is not otherwise required to engage in a
transaction with the principal in the same circumstances;
(b) Engaging in a transaction with the agent or the principal in
the same circumstances would be inconsistent with federal law;
-
*SB369*

– 23 –
(c) The person has actual knowledge of the termination of the
agent’s authority or of the power of attorney before exercise of the
power;
(d) A request for a certification, a translation or an opinion of
counsel pursuant to NRS 162A.360 is refused;
(e) The person in good faith believes that the power is not valid
or that the agent does not have the authority to perform the act
requested, whether or not a certification, a translation or an opinion
of counsel has been requested or provided pursuant to
NRS 162A.360;
(f) The person makes, or has actual knowledge that another
person has made, a report pursuant to NRS 200.5093 stating a good
faith belief that the principal may be subject to abuse, neglect,
exploitation, isolation or abandonment by the agent or a person
acting for or with the agent; or
(g) The person:
(1) Makes, or has actual knowledge that another person has
made, a report pursuant to NRS 657.290 , 672.779, 673.807,
677.707 or sections 7, 17, 27 or 37 of this act of the known or
suspected exploitation by the agent, or a person acting for or with
the agent, of the principal who is an older person or vulnerable
person; or
(2) Is a designated reporter of a financial institution , credit
union, savings bank or thrift company who, pursuant to NRS
657.290, 672.779, 673.807, 677.707 or sections 7, 17, 27 or 37 of
this act delays a requested disbursement or transaction involving a
principal who is an older person or vulnerable person whom the
designated reporter knows or has reasonable cause to believe is
being exploited.
3. A person that refuses in violation of this section to accept an
acknowledged power of attorney is subject to:
(a) A court order mandating acceptance of the power of
attorney; and
(b) Liability for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in
any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the power of
attorney or mandates acceptance of the power of attorney.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Designated reporter” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
657.230 [.] , 672.769, 673.777 or 677.677, as applicable.
(b) “Older person” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS [657.250.] 200.5092.
(c) “Vulnerable person” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS [657.270.] 200.5092.
H
-
*SB369*